Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1008.
do enact as follows:AB1008,14Section 1. 49.155 (1m) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1008,2,12549.155 (1m) (a) (intro.) Subject to sub. (2), the individual is a parent of a child 1who meets the requirement under s. 49.145 (2) (c) and who is under the age of 13 or, 2if the child is disabled, is under the age of 19; or is a relative an individual who, 3under s. 48.57 (3m) or (3n) or 48.62, is providing care and maintenance for a child 4who meets the requirement under s. 49.145 (2) (c) and who is under the age of 13 or, 5if the child is disabled, is under the age of 19; and child care services for that child 6are needed in order for the individual to participate in an approved activity. An 7individual who is eligible to receive a child care subsidy under this subsection shall 8remain eligible for that subsidy for a period of 3 months after the individual 9permanently ceases participation in the approved activity or until the department 10or the county department or agency redetermines the individual’s eligibility, 11whichever is earlier. In this paragraph, “approved activity” means any of the 12following:AB1008,213Section 2. 49.155 (1m) (c) 1h. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1008,2,211449.155 (1m) (c) 1h. If the individual is a relative of the child, is providing care 15for the child under a court order, and is receiving payments under s. 48.57 (3m) or 16(3n) on behalf of the child, the child’s biological or adoptive family has a gross 17income that is at or below 200 percent of the poverty line. In calculating the gross 18income of the child’s biological or adoptive family, the department or county 19department or agency determining eligibility shall include court-ordered child or 20family support payments received by the individual, if those support payments 21exceed $1,250 per month, and income described under s. 49.145 (3) (b) 1. and 3.AB1008,322Section 3. 49.155 (1m) (cm) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1008,3,22349.155 (1m) (cm) 3. A relative of the child An individual who is providing care 1for the child under a court order and receiving payments under s. 48.57 (3m) or (3n) 2on behalf of the child.AB1008,43Section 4. 49.46 (1) (a) 16. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1008,3,6449.46 (1) (a) 16. Any child who is living with a relative an individual who is 5eligible to receive payments under s. 48.57 (3m) or (3n) with respect to that child, if 6the department determines that no other insurance is available to the child.AB1008,3,77